Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1134.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3132(a) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3132. Vacancies in office.(a) [General rule] Procedure.--(1) Except as provided in [subsection] subsections (a.1) and (b), a vacancy in the office of judge or magisterial district judge shall be filled by appointment by the Governor following the required period of public comment as provided in subsection (a.1). The appointment shall be with the advice and consent of two-thirds of the members elected to the Senate, except in the case of magisterial district judges which shall be by a majority.12345678910111213141516171819 (2) Prior to voting on the confirmation of any nominee for appointment to the Supreme Court, Superior Court, Commonwealth Court, a court of common pleas or a magisterial district judge, a public, broadcasted confirmation hearing shall be conducted in which equal time is reserved for questions from the majority and the minority members of the designated committee to which the nomination has been referred.(3) The person so appointed shall serve for a term ending on the first Monday of January following the next municipal election more than ten months after the vacancy occurs or for the remainder of the unexpired term whichever is less.(a.1) Judicial vacancies public comment period.--(1) Upon the occurrence of a vacancy under subsection (a), the Governor shall direct the Office of General Counsel to solicit applications for the vacancy for a period of not less than 30 days.(2) Following the application period, the Office of General Counsel shall publish on a publicly accessible Internet website the application materials of each applicant, which shall include a current statement of financial interests for the applicant that satisfies 65 Pa.C.S. § 1105 (relating to statement of financial interests), redacting personal information as defined by section 708(b)(6)(i) of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, for a period of not less than 30 days during which time the Governor shall refrain from making an appointment. Public comment received during this period shall be furnished to the chairperson and minority chairperson of 20260SB1134PN1383 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the designated committee to which the nomination has been referred.(3) Thereafter, the Governor shall submit to the Senate a nominee for the advice and consent of the Senate from among the applicants under paragraph (1).(4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the authority of the Governor to exercise personal judgment in appointing a person to the office of justice, judge or magisterial district judge or to limit further review of applicants by the Office of General Counsel.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1134PN1383 - 3 - 123456789101112